Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Chapter 34. Interstate Compact on Educational Opportunity for Military Children.
The Interstate Commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment from each member state to cover the cost of the operations and activities of the Interstate Commission and its staff which must be in a total amount sufficient to cover the Interstate Commission’s annual budget as approved each year. The aggregate annual assessment amount shall be allocated based upon a formula to be determined by the Interstate Commission, which shall promulgate a rule binding upon all member states.

The Interstate Commission may not incur obligations of any kind before securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the Interstate Commission pledge the credit of any of the member states, except by and with the authority of the member state.

The Interstate Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the Interstate Commission shall be subject to the audit and accounting procedures established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the Interstate Commission shall be audited yearly by a certified or licensed public accountant and the report of the audit shall be included in and become part of the annual report of the Interstate Commission.

ARTICLE XV

MEMBER STATES, EFFECTIVE DATE, AND AMENDMENT

A state is eligible to become a member state.

The compact shall become effective and binding upon legislative enactment of the compact into law by no less than 10 of the states. The effective date shall be no earlier than December 1, 2007; thereafter it shall become effective and binding as to any other member state upon enactment of the compact into law by that state. The governors of non-member states or their designees shall be invited to participate in the activities of the Interstate Commission on a non-voting basis prior to adoption of the compact by all states.

The Interstate Commission may propose amendments to the compact for enactment by the member states. No amendment shall become effective and binding upon the Interstate Commission and the member states unless and until it is enacted into law by unanimous consent of the member states.

ARTICLE XVI

WITHDRAWAL AND DISSOLUTION

Withdrawal

once effective, the compact shall continue in force and remain binding upon each and every member state; provided that a member state may withdraw from the compact by specifically repealing the statute, which enacted the compact into law;

withdrawal from this compact shall be by the enactment of a statute repealing the same, but shall not take effect until one year after the effective date of the statute and until written notice of the withdrawal has been given by the withdrawing state to the governor of each other member jurisdiction;

the withdrawing state shall immediately notify the chairperson of the Interstate Commission in writing upon the introduction of legislation repealing this compact in the withdrawing state; the Interstate Commission shall notify the other member states of the withdrawing state’s intent to withdraw within 60 days of its receipt of the intent to withdraw;

the withdrawing state is responsible for all assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred through the effective date of withdrawal, including obligations, the performance of which extend beyond the effective date of withdrawal;

reinstatement following withdrawal of a member state shall occur upon the withdrawing state reenacting the compact or upon such later date as determined by the Interstate Commission.

Dissolution of compact

this compact shall dissolve effective upon the date of the withdrawal or default of the member state which reduces the membership in the compact to one member state;

upon the dissolution of this compact, the compact becomes null and void and shall be of no further force or effect, and the business and affairs of the Interstate Commission shall be concluded and surplus funds shall be distributed in accordance with the bylaws.

ARTICLE XVII

SEVERABILITY AND CONSTRUCTION

The provisions of this compact shall be severable, and if any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision is deemed unenforceable, the remaining provisions of the compact shall be enforceable.

The provisions of this compact shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

Nothing in this compact shall be construed to prohibit the applicability of other interstate compacts to which the states are members.

ARTICLE XVIII

BINDING EFFECT OF COMPACT AND OTHER LAWS

Other laws

Nothing herein prevents the enforcement of any other law of a member state that is not inconsistent with this compact;

All member states’ laws conflicting with this compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict;

Binding effect of the compact

All lawful actions of the Interstate Commission, including all rules and bylaws promulgated by the Interstate Commission, are binding upon the member states;

All agreements between the Interstate Commission and the member states are binding in accordance with their terms;

If any provision of this compact exceeds the constitutional limits imposed on the legislature of any member state, the provision shall be ineffective to the extent of the conflict with the constitutional provision in question in that member state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 2009)